District of Columbia statutes.
7-2341.11

Licenses and certifications issued pursuant to prior authority.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any emergency medical services agency, ambulance or other emergency medical response vehicle, emergency medical technician or paramedic, emergency medical services instructor or preceptor, or emergency medical services training facility currently licensed or certified pursuant to the Regulation to Establish Standards for Ambulances and Medical Personnel and to Provide for their Certification, enacted December 13, 1972 (Reg. 72-29; 29 DCMR §§ 500 et seq.) (“Ambulance and Medical Personnel Regulation”), as amended, shall be considered licensed or certified pursuant to this chapter, and shall be subject to the renewal requirements established by this chapter and by rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

History

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-357, § 12, 56 DCR 1167